dictionaries/ca/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: doldre
SFX 48 Y 70
SFX 48 e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 48 dre er/_v_C_Y re
SFX 48 dre ent/_C re
SFX 48 dre gut/_v_Y re
SFX 48 dre guda/_Y re
SFX 48 dre guts/_Y re
SFX 48 dre gudes/_Y re
SFX 48 dre c/_Z re
SFX 48 dre s/_Z re
SFX 48 dre 0/_Z re
SFX 48 dre em/_Z re
SFX 48 dre eu/_Z re
SFX 48 dre en/_Z re
SFX 48 dre ia/_Z re
SFX 48 dre ies/_Z re
SFX 48 dre ia/_Z re
SFX 48 dre íem/_Z re
SFX 48 dre íeu/_Z re
SFX 48 dre ien/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guí/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gueres/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gué/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guérem/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guéreu/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 48 e é/_Z re
SFX 48 e às/_Z re
SFX 48 e à/_Z re
SFX 48 e em/_Z re
SFX 48 e eu/_Z re
SFX 48 e an/_Z re
SFX 48 e ia/_Z re
SFX 48 e ies/_Z re
SFX 48 e ia/_Z re
SFX 48 e íem/_Z re
SFX 48 e íeu/_Z re
SFX 48 e ien/_Z re
SFX 48 dre ga/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gui/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gues/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guis/_Z re
SFX 48 dre ga/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gui/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guem/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gueu/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guen/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guin/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gués/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guera/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guessis/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gueres/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guesses/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gués/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guera/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guéssim/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guérem/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guéssem/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guéreu/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guésseu/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guessin/_Z re
SFX 48 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 48 dre guessen/_Z re
SFX 48 dre 0/_C re
SFX 48 dre ga/_D re
SFX 48 dre gui/_D re
SFX 48 dre guem/_C re
SFX 48 dre eu/_C re
SFX 48 dre guen/_C re
SFX 48 dre guin/_C re

# Model de conjugació: donar
SFX 49 Y 87
SFX 49 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 49 r nt/_C ar
SFX 49 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 49 r da/_Y ar
SFX 49 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 49 r des/_Y ar
SFX 49 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 49 onar ónes/_Z ar
SFX 49 onar ones/_Z ar
SFX 49 onar óna/_Z ar
SFX 49 onar ona/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 49 r m/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 49 r u/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 49 r va/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 49 r va/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 49 r res/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 49 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 49 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 49 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 49 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 49 onar ónes/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 49 r res/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 49 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 49 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 49 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 49 onar óna/_D ar
SFX 49 onar ona/_D ar
SFX 49 ar e/_D ar
SFX 49 ar i/_D ar
SFX 49 ar em/_C ar
SFX 49 r u/_C ar
SFX 49 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 49 ar en/_C ar
SFX 49 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: dormir
SFX 4A Y 73
SFX 4A r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 4A r nt/_C ir
SFX 4A r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 4A r da/_Y ir
SFX 4A r ts/_Y ir
SFX 4A r des/_Y ir
SFX 4A ir o/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir s/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 4A r m/_Z ir
SFX 4A r u/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir en/_Z ir
SFX 4A r a/_Z ir
SFX 4A r es/_Z ir
SFX 4A r a/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 4A r en/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir í/_Z ir
SFX 4A r res/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir í/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ren/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ré/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 4A r rà/_Z ir
SFX 4A r rem/_Z ir
SFX 4A r reu/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ran/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ria/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ries/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ria/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 4A r rien/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir a/_Z ir
SFX 4A r 0/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir es/_Z ir
SFX 4A r s/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir a/_Z ir
SFX 4A r 0/_Z ir
SFX 4A r m/_Z ir
SFX 4A r guem/_Z ir
SFX 4A r u/_Z ir
SFX 4A r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir en/_Z ir
SFX 4A r n/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ra/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 4A r res/_Z ir
SFX 4A r sses/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ra/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ren/_Z ir
SFX 4A r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 4A ir 0/_C ir
SFX 4A ir a/_D ir
SFX 4A r 0/_D ir
SFX 4A r m/_C ir
SFX 4A r guem/_C ir
SFX 4A r u/_C ir
SFX 4A ir en/_C ir
SFX 4A r n/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: dur
SFX 4B Y 81
SFX 4B r r/_v_C_Y ur
SFX 4B r ent/_C ur
SFX 4B r t/_v_Y ur
SFX 4B r it/_v_Y ur
SFX 4B r ta/_Y ur
SFX 4B r ita/_Y ur
SFX 4B r ts/_Y ur
SFX 4B r its/_Y ur
SFX 4B r tes/_Y ur
SFX 4B r ites/_Y ur
SFX 4B r c/_Z ur
SFX 4B r s/_Z ur
SFX 4B r us/_Z ur
SFX 4B r 0/_Z ur
SFX 4B r u/_Z ur
SFX 4B r em/_Z ur
SFX 4B r im/_Z ur
SFX 4B r eu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r is/_Z ur
SFX 4B r en/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ia/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ies/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ia/_Z ur
SFX 4B ur úiem/_Z ur
SFX 4B ur úieu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ien/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guí/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gueres/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gué/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guérem/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guéreu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gueren/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ré/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ràs/_Z ur
SFX 4B r rà/_Z ur
SFX 4B r rem/_Z ur
SFX 4B r reu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ran/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ria/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ries/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ria/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ríem/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ríeu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r rien/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ga/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gui/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gues/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guis/_Z ur
SFX 4B r ga/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gui/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guem/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gueu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guen/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guin/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gués/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guera/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guessis/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gueres/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guesses/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gués/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guera/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guéssim/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guérem/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guéssem/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guéssiu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guéreu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guésseu/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guessin/_Z ur
SFX 4B r gueren/_Z ur
SFX 4B r guessen/_Z ur
SFX 4B r 0/_C ur
SFX 4B r u/_C ur
SFX 4B r s/_C ur
SFX 4B r us/_C ur
SFX 4B r ga/_D ur
SFX 4B r gui/_D ur
SFX 4B r guem/_C ur
SFX 4B r eu/_C ur
SFX 4B r is/_C ur
SFX 4B r guen/_C ur
SFX 4B r guin/_C ur

# Model de conjugació: endur
SFX 4C Y 81
SFX 4C r r/_v_C_Y ur
SFX 4C r ent/_C ur
SFX 4C r t/_v_Y ur
SFX 4C r it/_v_Y ur
SFX 4C r ta/_Y ur
SFX 4C r ita/_Y ur
SFX 4C r ts/_Y ur
SFX 4C r its/_Y ur
SFX 4C r tes/_Y ur
SFX 4C r ites/_Y ur
SFX 4C r c/_Z ur
SFX 4C r us/_Z ur
SFX 4C ur ús/_Z ur
SFX 4C r u/_Z ur
SFX 4C ur ú/_Z ur
SFX 4C r em/_Z ur
SFX 4C r im/_Z ur
SFX 4C r eu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r is/_Z ur
SFX 4C r en/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ia/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ies/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ia/_Z ur
SFX 4C ur úiem/_Z ur
SFX 4C ur úieu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ien/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guí/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gueres/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gué/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guérem/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guéreu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gueren/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ré/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ràs/_Z ur
SFX 4C r rà/_Z ur
SFX 4C r rem/_Z ur
SFX 4C r reu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ran/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ria/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ries/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ria/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ríem/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ríeu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r rien/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ga/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gui/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gues/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guis/_Z ur
SFX 4C r ga/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gui/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guem/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gueu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guen/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guin/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gués/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guera/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guessis/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gueres/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guesses/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gués/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guera/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guéssim/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guérem/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guéssem/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guéssiu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guéreu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guésseu/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guessin/_Z ur
SFX 4C r gueren/_Z ur
SFX 4C r guessen/_Z ur
SFX 4C r u/_C ur
SFX 4C ur ú/_C ur
SFX 4C r us/_C ur
SFX 4C ur ús/_C ur
SFX 4C r ga/_D ur
SFX 4C r gui/_D ur
SFX 4C r guem/_C ur
SFX 4C r eu/_C ur
SFX 4C r is/_C ur
SFX 4C r guen/_C ur
SFX 4C r guin/_C ur
